District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.41

Prohibitions.

It is an unlawful discriminatory practice, subject to the exemptions in § 2-1401.03(b), for an educational institution:

(1)

To deny, restrict, or to abridge or condition the use of, or access to, any of its facilities, services, programs, or benefits of any program or activity to any person otherwise qualified, wholly or partially, for a discriminatory reason, based upon the actual or perceived: race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, family responsibilities, political affiliation, source of income, or disability of any individual; or

(2)

To make or use a written or oral inquiry, or form of application for admission, that elicits or attempts to elicit information, or to make or keep a record, concerning the race, color, religion, or national origin of an applicant for admission, except as permitted by regulations of the Office.

(3)

Repealed.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 241, 24 DCR 6038
Nov. 21, 1989, 103 Stat. 1284, Pub. L. 101-168, § 141(b)
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-129, § 2(f), 41 DCR 2583
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-242, § 2(g), 46 DCR 952
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-189, § 2(e), 49 DCR 6523
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-58, § 2(f), 53 DCR 14
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-266, § 3(a), 62 DCR 1540
1981 Ed., § 1-2520.
1973 Ed., § 6-2251.
D.C. Law 14-189, in par. (1), substituted “facilities, services, programs, or benefits of any program or activity” for “facilities and services” and substituted “actual or perceived: race” for “race”.
D.C. Law 16-58, in par. (1), substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,” for “sexual orientation,”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-266 repealed (3).